Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1165
Hearing; party; rights; enumerated.

Any party at a hearing conducted under sections 79-1163 and 79-1164 shall have the right to:

(1) Be accompanied and advised by counsel and by individuals with special knowledge or training with respect to the problems of children with disabilities;

(2) Present evidence and confront, cross-examine, and compel the attendance of witnesses;

(3) Prohibit the introduction of any evidence at the hearing that has not been disclosed to that party at least five days before the hearing;

(4) Obtain a written or electronic verbatim record of the hearing; and

(5) Obtain written findings of fact and decisions.

The hearing officer may also produce evidence on the officer's own motion.

Laws 1978, LB 871, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-664;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3352;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 847;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 45.